Massachusetts, session 194th, H2837.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of section 24A of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 11, the words 
"7 trustees" and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 9 trustees. 
SECTION 2. Said subsection (b) of sad section 27A of said chapter 32A, as so appearing, 
is hereby further amended by inserting after the words "the comptroller or a designee," the 
following words:- 1 person to be appointed by the Massachusetts Municipal Association, 1 
person to be appointed by the Massachusetts Association of School Committees.